Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1848.02
Escape; notification required.

(1) As provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the victim, as defined in section 81-1848, and the prosecuting attorney shall be immediately notified of an escape by a prisoner confined and accused of, convicted of, or sentenced for committing a crime against the victim. The notice shall be given by any means reasonably calculated to give prompt actual notice to the victim and the prosecuting attorney.

(2) If the escape occurs before the sentence is executed or before the prisoner is delivered to the custody of the Department of Correctional Services or the county corrections agency, the chief law enforcement officer of the agency in charge of the prisoner's detention shall notify the victim and the prosecuting attorney of the escape.

(3) If the prisoner is confined pursuant to a sentence, the chief administrator of the facility where the prisoner was confined shall notify the victim and the prosecuting attorney.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB1181, § 8.
July 18, 2026